Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Dental services. (a) Medical assistance covers medically necessary dental services. (b) The following guidelines apply to dental services: (1) posterior fillings are paid at the amalgam rate; (2) application of sealants are covered once every five years per permanent molar; and (3) application of fluoride varnish is covered once every six months. (c) In addition to the services specified in paragraph (a), medical assistance covers the following services: (1) house calls or extended care facility calls for on-site delivery of covered services; (2) behavioral management when additional staff time is required to accommodate behavioral challenges and sedation is not used; (3) oral or IV sedation, if the covered dental service cannot be performed safely without it or would otherwise require the service to be performed under general anesthesia in a hospital or surgical center; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) prophylaxis, in accordance with an appropriate individualized treatment plan, but no more than four times per yearnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) pediatric zirconia crowns for childrennew text end . (d) The commissioner shall not require prior authorization for the services included in paragraph (c), clauses (1) to (3), and shall prohibit managed care and county-based purchasing plans from requiring prior authorization for the services included in paragraph (c), clauses (1) to (3), when provided under sections 256B.69, 256B.692, and 256L.12.